Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6003YC (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 the amount of business expense for a medical cannabidiol 4 manufacturer or a medical cannabidiol dispensary licensed 5 pursuant to chapter 124E without regard to section 280E of the 6 Internal Revenue Code. This subsection does not apply when no 7 licensed entity acting within the scope of the license pursuant 8 to chapter 124E incurred the expense, or to an expense incurred 9 in violation of section 124.401 and is not otherwise authorized 10 by law. 11 Sec. 2. Section 422.35, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. Subtract, to the extent included, 14 the amount of business expense for a medical cannabidiol 15 manufacturer or a medical cannabidiol dispensary licensed 16 pursuant to chapter 124E without regard to section 280E of the 17 Internal Revenue Code. This subsection does not apply when no 18 licensed entity acting within the scope of the license pursuant 19 to chapter 124E incurred the expense, or to an expense incurred 20 in violation of section 124.401 and is not otherwise authorized 21 by law. 22 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 23 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 24 or after that date. 25